Louisiana, session 2026, SB199.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:82.2(C)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§82.2. Purchase of commercial sexual activity; penalties
* * *
C.(1) * * *
(2) On a second conviction, the offender shall be imprisoned, with or
without hard labor, for not less than six months nor more than two years, with
not less than six months being served without the benefit of probation, parole,
or suspension of sentence, and in addition may be fined not less than one thousand
five hundred dollars nor more than two thousand dollars or be imprisoned, with or
without hard labor, for not more than two years, or both, and one-half . One-half of
the fines collected shall be distributed in accordance with R.S. 15:539.4.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 15:541(24)(a) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§541. Definitions
For the purposes of this Chapter, the definitions of terms in this Section shall
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 199 ENROLLED
apply:
* * *
(24)(a) "Sex offense" means deferred adjudication, adjudication withheld, or
conviction for the perpetration or attempted perpetration of or conspiracy to commit
human trafficking when prosecuted under the provisions of R.S. 14:46.2(B)(2), R.S.
14:46.3 (trafficking of children for sexual purposes), R.S. 14:89 (crime against
nature), R.S. 14:89.1 (aggravated crime against nature), R.S. 14:89.2(B)(3) (crime
against nature by solicitation), R.S. 14:80 (felony carnal knowledge of a juvenile),
R.S. 14:81 (indecent behavior with juveniles), R.S. 14:81.1 (pornography involving
juveniles) which occurred prior to August 1, 2025, R.S. 14:81.2 (molestation of a
juvenile or a person with a physical or mental disability), R.S. 14:81.3 (computer-
aided solicitation of a minor), R.S. 14:81.4 (prohibited sexual conduct between an
educator and student), R.S. 14:82.1 (prostitution; persons under eighteen), R.S.
14:82.2(C)(2), (4), or (5) (purchase of commercial sexual activity), R.S. 14:83(B)(2)
or (3) (soliciting for prostitutes), R.S. 14:92(A)(7) (contributing to the delinquency
of juveniles), R.S. 14:93.5 (sexual battery of persons with infirmities), R.S.
14:106(A)(5) (obscenity by solicitation of a person under the age of seventeen), R.S.
14:283 (video voyeurism), R.S. 14:41 (rape), R.S. 14:42 (aggravated or first degree
rape), R.S. 14:42.1 (forcible or second degree rape), R.S. 14:43 (simple or third
degree rape), R.S. 14:43.1 (sexual battery), R.S. 14:43.2 (second degree sexual
battery), R.S. 14:43.3 (oral sexual battery), R.S. 14:43.5 (intentional exposure to
HIV), a second or subsequent conviction of R.S. 14:283.1 (voyeurism), or a second
or subsequent conviction of R.S. 14:89.3 (sexual abuse of an animal), committed on
or after June 18, 1992, or committed prior to June 18, 1992, if the person, as a result
of the offense, is under the custody of the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections on or after June 18, 1992. A conviction for any offense provided in this
definition includes a conviction for the offense under the laws of another state, or
military, territorial, foreign, tribal, or federal law which is equivalent to an offense
provided for in this Chapter, unless the tribal court or foreign conviction was not
obtained with sufficient safeguards for fundamental fairness and due process for the
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 199 ENROLLED
accused as provided by the federal guidelines adopted pursuant to the Adam Walsh
Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.